California statutes. Financial Code
 the bank transacts commercial banking business, except the business of receiving deposits.

(l) “Office,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, means any agency, branch office, or representative office of the bank.

(m) “Primary office,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain a single agency or branch office, means the agency or branch office and, when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain two or more agencies or branch offices, means that one of the offices which the bank has designated as its primary office in accordance with Section 1766.

(n) “Representative office,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, means an office in this state at which the bank engages in representational
 functions but at which it does not transact commercial banking business.

(o) “Retail branch office,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, means a place in this state at which the bank transacts commercial banking business, including (without limitation) the business of receiving deposits.

(p) “Wholesale branch office,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, means a place in this state at which the bank transacts commercial banking business but at which it does not transact the business of receiving deposits except as permitted under paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1805.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1751.

Nothing in this chapter, except Section 1760, applies to a federal agency or branch in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.

(a) In this section, “subject bank” means a bank organized under the laws of any territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the Virgin Islands, or the Northern Mariana Islands.

(b) Nothing in this chapter, except subdivision (c), shall apply to a subject bank that maintains a branch office in this state as a foreign (other state) state
 bank pursuant to Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 1670), Section 13(f), 13(k), 18(d), or 44 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1823(f), 1823(k), 1828(d), or 1831u), or Section 9 of the Federal Reserve Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 321).

(c) No subject bank shall at the same time maintain (1) as a foreign (other nation) bank, an office in this state licensed under this chapter and (2) as a foreign (other state) state bank, a branch office in this state pursuant to Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 1670), Section 13(f), 13(k), 18(d), or 44 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1823(f), 1823(k), 1828(d), or 1831u), or Section 9 of the Federal Reserve Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 321).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.

For purposes of this chapter, offices of foreign (other nation) banks are divided into classes and ranked in ascending order, as follows:

(a) Representative office.

(b) Nondepositary agency.

(c) Depositary agency.

(d) Limited branch
 office.

(e) Wholesale branch office.

(f) Retail branch office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1754.

(a) For purposes of this chapter:

(1) Changing a lower class office into a higher class office shall be treated as establishing the higher class office, but not as closing the lower class office.

(2) Changing a higher class office into a lower class office shall be treated as closing the higher class office, but not as establishing the
 lower class office.

(b) In the case of changing a higher class office into a lower class office, when the application for approval to close the higher class office has been approved and all conditions precedent to the closing have been fulfilled, the foreign (other nation) bank may change the higher class office into the lower class office, and the commissioner shall issue a license authorizing the bank to maintain the lower class office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1755.

Fees shall be paid to, and collected by, the commissioner, as follows:

(a) The fee for filing with the commissioner an application by a foreign (other nation) bank that is not licensed to transact business in this state for approval to establish a branch office shall be two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(b) The fee for filing with the commissioner an application
 by a foreign (other nation) bank that is not licensed to transact business in this state for approval to establish an agency shall be one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(c) The fee for filing with the commissioner an application by a foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to transact business in this state for approval to establish a branch office shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) The fee for filing with the commissioner an application by a foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to transact business in this state for approval to establish an agency shall be seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).

(e) The fee for filing with the commissioner an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to establish a representative office shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(f) The fee for filing with the commissioner an application by a foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain an agency or branch office for approval to relocate or to close the office shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(g) The fee for filing with the commissioner an application by a foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain a representative office for approval to relocate or to close the representative office shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

(h) The fee for issuing a license shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(i) Each foreign (other nation) bank that on June 1st of any year is licensed to maintain a representative office but is not licensed to transact business in this state shall pay, on or before the following
 July 1st, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each such representative office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1756.

Each application filed with the commissioner under this chapter or under any regulation or order issued under this chapter shall be in such form, shall contain such information, shall be signed in such manner, and shall (if the commissioner so requires by regulation or order) be verified in such manner, as the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1757.

(a) In this section, “act” includes (without limitation) omission.

(b) For purposes of making findings on an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to establish an office:

(1) The commissioner may, in the absence of credible evidence to the contrary, presume that the directors, executive officers, and any controlling
 person of the bank and the directors and executive officers of any controlling person of the bank are each of good character and sound financial standing.

(2) The commissioner may find that the bank, a director, executive officer, or a controlling person of the bank, or a director or executive officer of a controlling person of the bank is not of good character if that person has done any of the following:

(A) Has been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, any crime involving an act of fraud or dishonesty.

(B) Has consented to or suffered a judgment in any civil action based upon conduct involving an act of fraud or dishonesty.

(C) Has consented to or suffered the suspension or revocation of any professional, occupational, or vocational
 license based upon conduct involving an act of fraud or dishonesty.

(D) Has willfully made or caused to be made in any application or report filed with the commissioner or in any proceeding before the commissioner, any statement that was at the time and in the light of the circumstances under which it was made false or misleading with respect to any material fact, or has willfully omitted to state in any application or report filed with the commissioner or in any proceeding before the commissioner, any material fact that was required to be stated therein.

(E) Has willfully committed any violation of, or has willfully aided, abetted, counseled, commanded, induced, or procured the violation by any other person of, any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division.

(c) Paragraph (2)
 of subdivision (b) shall not be deemed to be an exclusive list of the grounds upon which the commissioner may find, for purposes of making findings on an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to establish an office, that the bank, a director, executive officer, or controlling person of the bank, or a director or executive officer of a controlling person of the bank is not of good character.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.

(a) Each foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain an office shall file with the commissioner reports as and when the commissioner may, by regulation or order, require.

(b) Each report filed with the commissioner under this chapter or under any regulation or order issued under this chapter shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the manner, and shall (if
 the commissioner so requires by regulation or order) be verified in the manner, that the commissioner may, by regulation or order, require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1759.

Each foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain an office shall make, keep, and preserve at the office or at another place that the commissioner may, by regulation or order, approve, the books, accounts, and other records relating to the business of the office, in the form, in the manner, and for the time that the commissioner may, by regulation or order, provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1760.

(a) No foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to maintain an agency or branch office shall concurrently maintain a federal agency or federal branch in this state.

(b) No foreign (other nation) bank which maintains a federal agency or federal branch in this state shall concurrently be licensed to maintain an agency or branch office in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1761.

(a) No foreign (other nation) bank shall concurrently be licensed to maintain offices of different classes.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit a foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain a representative office from being concurrently licensed to maintain an office of a different class or to prohibit a foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain an office other than a
 representative office from being concurrently licensed to maintain a representative office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1762.

(a) (1) No foreign (other nation) bank (other than a bank that is licensed to maintain an agency or branch office) shall be issued a license to maintain a representative office unless it shall have first filed with the commissioner, in the form that the commissioner may by regulation or order require, an appointment irrevocably appointing the commissioner and the commissioner’s successor from time to time in office to be the bank’s attorney to
 receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against the bank or any of its successors that arises out of the activities in this state of the representative office after the appointment has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the bank or its successor, as the case may be.

(2) Any foreign (other nation) bank (other than a bank that is licensed to maintain an agency or branch office or that maintains a federal agency or federal branch in this state) that maintains a representative office and that has not filed with the commissioner an appointment pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed by the maintenance of that office to have appointed the commissioner as its attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against the bank or any of its successors that arises out of the activities in this state of the
 representative office with the same force and validity as if served personally on the bank or its successor, as the case may be.

(b) (1) No foreign (other nation) bank shall be issued a license to maintain an agency or branch office unless it shall have first filed with the commissioner, in the form that the commissioner may by regulation or order require, an appointment irrevocably appointing the commissioner and the commissioner’s successor from time to time in office to be the bank’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against the bank or any of its successors that arises after the appointment has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the bank or its successor, as the case may be.

(2) Any foreign (other nation) bank that maintains an agency or branch
 office (other than a federal agency or federal branch) and that has not filed with the commissioner an appointment pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed by the maintenance of that office to have appointed the commissioner as its attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against the bank or any of its successors with the same force and validity as if served personally on the bank or its successor, as the case may be.

(c) Service may be made on a foreign (other nation) bank that has appointed or is deemed to have appointed the commissioner as its attorney for service of process by leaving a copy of the process at any office of the commissioner. However, the service is not effective unless (1) the party making the service, who may be the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the bank served at its last
 address on file with the commissioner at any of its offices in this state or at its head office, and (2) an affidavit of compliance with this subdivision by the party making service is filed in the case on or before the return date, if any, or within any further time that the court, in the case of a judicial proceeding, or the administrative agency, in the case of an administrative proceeding, allows.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1763.

No license shall be transferable or assignable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.

Each foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain an office shall post its license in a conspicuous place at the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1765.

(a) Each foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain an office shall assign to the office a popular name that consists of a specific designation by name or number and shall post the popular name and the name of the bank in a conspicuous place at the office.

(b) The popular name that a foreign (other nation) bank assigns to a representative office that it is licensed to maintain shall
 include the term “representative office.”

(c) The popular name that a foreign (other nation) bank assigns to an agency that it is licensed to maintain shall not include the term “branch” unless the term is modified by the word “foreign” or “overseas” or by a similar word.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1766.

Whenever a foreign (other nation) bank is licensed to maintain two or more agencies or branch offices, it shall designate one of such offices as its primary office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.

Each foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain an office shall conduct all of the business of the office in a single building or in adjoining buildings. However, for good cause and with the approval of the commissioner, the bank may conduct part of the business of the office elsewhere in the same vicinity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1768.

Any foreign (other nation) bank that, at the time it makes a loan or forbearance or executes a contract therefor, has assets equal to at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), is licensed to maintain an office in California, is licensed or otherwise authorized by another state of the United States to maintain an agency or branch office in that state, or maintains a federal agency or federal branch in any state of the United States is exempted from the restrictions of Section 1
 of Article XV of the Constitution relating to rates of interest upon the loan or forbearance of any money, goods, or things in action or on accounts after demand.

This section does not exempt a foreign (other nation) bank or a subsidiary thereof from complying with all other laws and regulations governing the business in which such a bank or subsidiary is engaged.

This section creates and authorizes an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Representative Offices [1780. - 1784.]

1780.

(a) No foreign (other nation) bank shall establish or maintain an office in this state at which it engages in representational functions unless it is licensed to maintain a representative office, agency, or branch office at that place.

(b) (1) No person shall establish or maintain an office in this state as representative of a foreign (other nation) bank unless the bank is
 licensed to maintain the office as a representative office.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, if any person establishes or maintains an office in this state as representative of a foreign (other nation) bank, the bank shall be deemed to establish and maintain the office as a representative office.

(c) Neither subdivision (a) nor subdivision (b) shall be deemed to prohibit a foreign (other nation) bank that maintains a federal agency or federal branch in this state from establishing or maintaining one or more representative offices in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1781.

(a) (1) No foreign (other nation) bank shall establish or maintain a representative office unless the commissioner shall have first approved the establishment of the office and issued a license authorizing the bank to maintain the office.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be deemed to prohibit a foreign (other nation) bank that maintains a federal agency or federal branch in this state
 from establishing or maintaining one or more representative offices in this state.

(b) If the commissioner finds the following with respect to an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to establish a representative office, the commissioner shall approve the application:

(1) That the bank, any controlling person of the bank, the directors and executive officers of the bank or of any controlling person of the bank, and the proposed management of the office are each of good character and sound financial standing.

(2) That the financial history and condition of the bank are satisfactory.

(3) That the management of the bank and the proposed management of the office are adequate.

(4) That it is reasonable to believe that, if licensed to maintain the office, the bank will operate the office in compliance with all applicable laws, regulations, and orders.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to establish a representative office has been approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of a license authorizing the bank to maintain the office have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall issue the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1782.

(a) No foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain a representative office shall relocate the office unless the commissioner shall have first approved the relocation and issued a license authorizing the bank to maintain the office at the new site.

(b) If the commissioner finds the following with respect to an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to relocate a
 representative office, the commissioner shall approve the application:

(1) In case the new site of the office is in the same vicinity as the old site, that the relocation of the office will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage; or

(2) In case the new site of the office is not in the same vicinity as the old site:

(A) That the relocation of the office from the old site will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage in the area that is primarily served by the office at the old site; and

(B) That the relocation of the office to the new site will promote the public convenience and advantage.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner
 shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to relocate a representative office has been approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of a license authorizing the bank to maintain the office at the new site have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall issue the license.

(d) Promptly after a foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain a representative office relocates the office, the bank shall surrender to the commissioner the license that authorized it to maintain the office at the old site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1783.

A foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain a representative office may, subject to any regulations that the commissioner may prescribe, engage in representational functions at the office but shall not solicit or accept deposits or otherwise transact business at the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1784.

(a) (1) No foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain a representative office shall close the office unless the commissioner shall have first approved the closing.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be deemed to prohibit a foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain a representative office from closing the office in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with
 Section 1825).

(b) If the commissioner finds, with respect to an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to close a representative office, that the closing of the office will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage, the commissioner shall approve the application. If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to close a representative office has been approved and all conditions precedent to the closing have been fulfilled, the bank may close the office and shall promptly thereafter surrender to the commissioner the license that authorized it to maintain the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Agencies and Branch Offices [1800. - 1813.]

1800.

(a) No foreign (other nation) bank shall transact business in this state except at an agency or branch office that it is licensed to maintain and at which it is permitted by this chapter to transact the business transacted.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be deemed to prohibit:

(1) Any foreign (other nation) bank that maintains a federal
 agency or federal branch in this state from transacting at the federal agency or federal branch any business that it may be authorized to transact under applicable federal laws and regulations;

(2) Any foreign (other nation) bank from carrying on the activities described in subdivision (d) of Section 191 of the Corporations Code;

(3) Any foreign (other nation) bank that does not maintain an agency or branch office from making in this state loans secured by liens on real property located in this state; or

(4) Any foreign (other nation) bank that does not maintain an agency or branch office from transacting trust business as permitted under Section 1555.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (a), no foreign (other nation) bank shall be deemed to be transacting
 business in this state merely because a majority-owned subsidiary transacts business in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.

No foreign (other nation) bank shall be licensed to maintain any agency or branch office unless it is qualified to transact intrastate business in this state under Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.

No foreign (other nation) bank shall be licensed to maintain a retail branch office unless the deposits in such office are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation in accordance with the provisions of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.

(a) (1) No foreign (other nation) bank shall establish or maintain an agency or branch office unless the commissioner shall have first approved the establishment of that office and issued a license authorizing the bank to maintain the office.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be deemed to prohibit a foreign (other nation) bank from establishing or maintaining a federal agency or federal
 branch in this state.

(b) If the commissioner finds the following with respect to an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to establish an agency or branch office, the commissioner shall approve the application:

(1) That the bank, any controlling person of the bank, the directors and executive officers of the bank or of any controlling person of the bank, and the proposed management of the office are each of good character and sound financial standing.

(2) That the financial history and condition of the bank are satisfactory.

(3) That the management of the bank and the proposed management of the office are adequate.

(4) That it is reasonable to believe that, if licensed
 to maintain the office, the bank will operate the office in a safe and sound manner and in compliance with all applicable laws, regulations, and orders.

(5) That the bank’s plan to establish and to maintain the office affords reasonable promise of successful operation.

(6) That the bank’s establishment and maintenance of the office will promote the public convenience and advantage.

(7) In case the office is to be a branch office, that the foreign nation where the bank is domiciled permits banks organized under the laws of this state and national banks headquartered in this state to establish and maintain in those foreign nation offices substantially equivalent to agencies, offices substantially equivalent to branch offices, or wholly (except for directors’ qualifying shares) owned banks organized under the laws of
 the foreign nation.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to establish an agency or branch office has been approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of a license authorizing the bank to maintain the office have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall issue the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1804.

(a) No foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to maintain an agency or branch office shall relocate such office unless the commissioner shall have first approved such relocation and issued a license authorizing such bank to maintain the office at the new site.

(b) If the commissioner finds the following with respect to an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to relocate any
 agency or branch office, the commissioner shall approve such application:

(1) In case the new site of the office is in the same vicinity as the old site:

(A) That it will not be unsafe or unsound for the bank to relocate the office; and

(B) That the relocation of the office will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage, or that the relocation is necessary in the interests of the safety and soundness of the bank; or

(2) In case the new site of the office is not in the same vicinity as the old site:

(A) That the bank’s plan to relocate the office and to maintain the office at the new site affords reasonable promise of successful operation;

(B) That the relocation of the office from the old site will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage in the area which is primarily served by the office at the old site, or that the relocation is necessary in the interests of the safety and soundness of the bank; and

(C) That the relocation of the office to the new site will promote the public convenience and advantage.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to relocate an agency or branch office has been approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of a license authorizing such bank to maintain such office at the new site have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall issue
 such license.

(d) Promptly after a foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to maintain an agency or branch office relocates such office, such bank shall surrender to the commissioner the license which authorized it to maintain such office at the old site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1805.

(a) A foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain an agency or branch office may transact commercial banking business at the office, subject to the following:

(1) In case the office is a nondepositary agency, the bank shall not transact the business of accepting deposits.

(2) In case the office is a depositary agency, the bank shall not transact the business of accepting any deposits other than deposits of (A) a foreign nation, (B) an agency or instrumentality of a foreign nation, or (C) a person which resides, is domiciled, and maintains its principal place of business in a foreign nation. For purposes of this
 paragraph, “person” means any individual, proprietorship, joint venture, partnership, trust, business trust, syndicate, association, joint stock company, corporation, limited liability company, or any other organization or any branch or division thereof.

(3) In case the office is a limited branch office, the bank shall not transact the business of accepting any deposits other than (A) deposits of the kind described in paragraph (2), or (B) deposits that a corporation organized under Section 25A of the Federal Reserve Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 612 et seq.) is permitted to accept.

(4) In case the office is a wholesale branch office, the bank shall not transact the business of accepting any deposits other than (A) deposits of the kind described in paragraph (2), (B) deposits of two
 hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more, or (C) deposits the acceptance of which the commissioner determines by regulation or order do not constitute engaging in domestic retail deposit activities requiring deposit insurance protection.

(5) In case the office is an agency, limited branch office, or wholesale branch office, the bank may, subject to any regulations that the commissioner may prescribe, maintain credit balances.

(6) In any case, the bank shall not transact any business that it is not authorized to transact or is prohibited from transacting under the law of its domicile or that commercial banks organized under the laws of this state are not authorized to transact or are prohibited from transacting.

(b) No foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain an agency or branch office shall transact any trust business at the office except as permitted under Section 1555.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 42.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1806.

(a) In addition to other provisions of this division and Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) that are otherwise applicable to or with respect to foreign (other nation) banks licensed to maintain nondepositary agencies, the following provisions of this division shall apply to or with respect to each foreign (other nation) bank licensed to maintain a nondepositary agency with respect to its business in this state as if the bank were a commercial bank organized under the laws of this state:

(1) Article 6 (commencing with Section 405) of Chapter 3 of Division 1.

(2) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 550) of Division 1.

(3) Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 1090).

(4) Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 1620).

(5) Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 1670).

(b) In addition to other provisions of this division and Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) which are otherwise applicable to or with respect to foreign (other nation) banks licensed to maintain depositary agencies or branch offices, the following provisions of this division and Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) shall apply to or with respect to each foreign (other nation) bank licensed to maintain a depositary agency or branch office with respect to its business in this state as if the bank were a commercial
 bank organized under the laws of this state:

(1) Article 6 (commencing with Section 405) of Chapter 3 of
 Division 1.

(2) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 550) of Division 1.

(3) Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 1090).

(4) Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1320).

(5) Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1400).

(6) Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1450).

(7) Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 1460).

(8) Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 1620).

(9) Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 1670).

(10) Section 1864 and Article 2 (commencing with Section 1900), Article 3 (commencing with Section 1905), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 1910) of Chapter 21.

(c) Whenever any provision of this chapter or of any regulation or order issued under this chapter that is applicable to or with respect to foreign (other nation) banks licensed to transact business in this state is inconsistent with any provision of any other chapter of this division and Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) that is applicable to or with respect to foreign (other nation) banks licensed to transact business in this state, the former provision shall apply, and the latter provision shall not apply.

(d) (1) Whenever any
 provision of this division (other than the provisions of this chapter) and Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) is applicable to or with respect to foreign (other nation) banks licensed to transact business in this state, the provision shall be applied with any changes in points of detail as may be necessary or appropriate.

(2) Without limiting the provisions of paragraph (1), for purposes of any provision of this division (other than the provisions of this chapter) and Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) that is applicable to or with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank licensed to transact business in this state:

(A) “Approved by (or approval of) the board” means approved or ratified by the board of the bank, by a committee of the board authorized to exercise the
 powers of the board with respect to the particular matter, or by an officer of the bank who is assigned to the head office of the bank and who has authority over the bank’s business in this state, including authority to approve or ratify the particular matter.

(B) “Head office” means the primary office of the bank.

(C) “Shareholders’ equity” means the shareholders’ equity of the bank or, if the bank has no shareholders’ equity, the closest equivalent account or accounts.

(e) Whenever any provision of this division (other than the provisions of this chapter) and Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) that is applicable to or with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank licensed to transact business in this state limits
 the amount of any assets or liabilities of the bank (including, by way of example, the amount of borrowings of, obligations to, or investments of the bank), for purposes of calculating the amount of the assets or liabilities, only the assets or liabilities of the agencies or branch offices of the bank shall be included, and the assets and liabilities of offices of the bank outside this state shall be excluded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 43.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1807.

(a) Whenever the commissioner calls for a report under Section 453 from commercial banks organized under the laws of this state, the commissioner shall call for a report from each foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to transact business in this state.

(b) (1) A foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to transact business in this state shall prominently display in the